South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 8, Title 41 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 41-8-125.  (A) For purposes of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the following are entitled to receive copies of employment verification forms and related documentation required for E-Verify from an employer, and the employer shall provide copies of such forms and documentation upon request: (1)   the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division; (2)   the Office of the Attorney General; (3)   the solicitor in any circuit where the employee works for the employer; and (4)   the Department of Employment and Workforce. (B) A person who makes a request pursuant to subsection (A) shall rely upon the federal government to verify the employment eligibility of an employee and may not independently make its own final determination as to whether an employee is an unauthorized alien. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----